Illinois, session 104th, SB2093.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 208 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/208)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-208)7    Sec. 208. Tax credit for residential real property taxes. 8Beginning with tax years ending on or after December 31, 1991, 9every individual taxpayer shall be entitled to a tax credit 10equal to 5% of real property taxes paid by such taxpayer during 11the taxable year on the principal residence of the taxpayer. 12In the case of multi-unit or multi-use structures and farm 13dwellings, the taxes on the taxpayer's principal residence 14shall be that portion of the total taxes which is attributable 15to such principal residence. Notwithstanding any other 16provision of law, for taxable years beginning on or after 17January 1, 2017, no taxpayer may claim a credit under this 18Section if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the 19taxable year exceeds (i) $500,000, in the case of spouses 20filing a joint federal tax return, or (ii) $250,000, in the 21case of all other taxpayers. 22    For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 23if the amount of the credit exceeds the taxpayer's income tax   SB2093- 2 -LRB104 10842 HLH 20923 b1liability for the applicable tax year, then the excess credit 2shall be refunded to the taxpayer. The amount of a refund shall 3not be included in the taxpayer's income or resources for the 4purposes of determining eligibility or benefit level in any 5means-tested benefit program administered by a governmental 6entity unless required by federal law. 7    This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 250. 8(Source: P.A. 101-8, see Section 99 for effective date; 9102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.